Hawaii, session 2026, SB2921.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that continuing shifts in federal policy are creating significant and widespread challenges in Hawaii and across the nation.  These federal changes, combined with broader economic trends, are expected to affect Hawaii's fiscal stability in the near future. Reductions in federal funding and uncertainty regarding future federal grant programs require the State to be prepared to assume financial responsibility for critical programs that currently rely on federal support. The legislature further finds that in periods of economic uncertainty, it is essential for the State to maintain the ability to fund important programs with moneys that are not immediately needed elsewhere.  In Act 87, Session Laws of Hawaii 2021, the State proactively transferred funds to mitigate fiscal disruptions caused by the coronavirus disease 2019 pandemic.  A similar approach is warranted in 2026 to ensure the continuity of essential services. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to transfer excess moneys from various funds and programs to the general fund. SECTION 2.  The legislature determines that there are amounts in excess of the requirements of the various funds listed in this Act.  The director of finance shall transfer the following amounts or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 from the following funds to the general fund: FUND NAME Minimum amount in excess of the requirements of the fund as determined by the legislature ($) Amount authorized to be transferred to the general fund by the director of finance ($) Department of Agriculture and Biosecurity 1 AGRICULTURAL LOAN REVOLVING FUND 0 0 2 AGRICULTURAL LOAN REVOLVING FUND (CLASS D EMERGENCY LOANS) 0 0 3 AQUACULTURE LOAN REVOLVING FUND 0 0 4 AQUACULTURE LOAN RESERVE FUND 0 0 5 ANIMAL INDUSTRY SPECIAL FUND 0 0 6 PEST INSPECTION, QUARANTINE AND ERADICATION FUND 0 0 7 ANIMAL QUARANTINE SPECIAL FUND 0 0 8 AGRICULTURAL PARK SPECIAL FUND 0 0 9 IRRIGATION SYSTEM REVOLVING FUND 0 0 10 NON-AGRICULTURAL PARK LANDS SPECIAL FUND 0 0 11 CERTIFICATION SERVICES REVOLVING FUND 0 0 12 INDUSTRIAL HEMP SPECIAL FUND 0 0 13 MILK CONTROL SPECIAL FUND 0 0 14 AQUACULTURE DEVELOPMENT SPECIAL FUND 0 0 15 SEAL OF QUALITY SPECIAL FUND 0 0 16 PESTICIDE USE REVOLVING FUND 0 0 Department of Accounting and General Services 17 STATE RISK MANAGEMENT REVOLVING FUND 0 0 18 SURPLUS FEDERAL PROPERTY REVOLVING FUND 0 0 19 WORKS OF ART SPECIAL FUND 0 0 20 ACCESS HAWAII COMMITTEE SPECIAL FUND 0 0 21 SHARED SERVICES TECHNOLOGY SPECIAL FUND 0 0 22 STATE ARCHIVES PRESERVATION AND LONG-TERM ACCESS SPECIAL FUND 0 0 23 STATE MOTOR POOL REVOLVING FUND 0 0 24 STATE PARKING REVOLVING FUND 0 0 25 911 FUND 0 0 Department of the Attorney General 26 DNA REGISTRY SPECIAL FUND 0 0 27 MEDICAID INVESTIGATIONS RECOVERY FUND 0 0 28 TOBACCO ENFORCEMENT SPECIAL FUND 0 0 29 CRIMINAL FORFEITURE FUND 0 0 30 SOLICITATION OF FUNDS FOR CHARITABLE PURPOSES SPECIAL FUND 0 0 31 NOTARIES PUBLIC SPECIAL FUND 0 0 32 INTERNET CRIMES AGAINST CHILDREN SPECIAL FUND 0 0 33 CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORD IMPROVEMENT REVOLVING FUND 0 0 34 STATE DISASTER REVOLVING LOAN FUND 0 0 Department of Business, Economic Development, and Tourism 35 TOURISM SPECIAL FUND 0 0 36 TOURISM EMERGENCY SPECIAL FUND 0 0 37 HAWAII CONVENTION CENTER ENTERPRISE SPECIAL FUND 0 0 38 ENERGY SECURITY SPECIAL FUND 0 0 39 HAWAII GREEN INFRASTRUCTURE AUTHORITY 0 0 40 HAWAII GREEN INFRASTRUCTURE SPECIAL FUND 0 0 41 HAWAII FILM AND CREATIVE INDUSTRIES DEVELOPMENT SPECIAL FUND 0 0 42 HAWAII GREEN INFRASTRUCTURE SPECIAL FUND - STATE REVOLVING LOAN FUND 0 0 43 HI-CAP PROGRAMS 0 0 44 HAWAII COMMUNITY-BASED ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT SPECIAL FUND 0 0 45 CLEAN ENERGY AND ENERGY EFFICIENCY REVOLVING LOAN FUND 0 0 46 STRATEGIC DEVELOPMENT PROGRAMS REVOLVING FUND 0 0 47 HAWAII COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT SPECIAL FUND 0 0 48 KALAELOA COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT SPECIAL FUND 0 0 49 DWELLING UNIT REVOLVING FUND 0 0 50 NATURAL ENERGY LABORATORY OF HAWAII AUTHORITY 0 0 51 HAWAII AGRICULTURE DEVELOPMENT REVOLVING FUND 0 0 52 WAIAHOLE WATER SYSTEM REVOLVING FUND 0 0 53 STADIUM MANAGER'S DISCRETIONARY FUND 0 0 54 STADIUM DEVELOPMENT SPECIAL FUND 0 0 55 HOUSING LOAN PROGRAM REVENUE BOND REVOLVING FUND - SINGLE FAMILY 0 0 56 RENTAL HOUSING REVOLVING FUND 0 0 57 HEEIA COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT SPECIAL FUND 0 0 58 HOUSING PROJECT BOND SPECIAL FUND - MULTIFAMILY 0 0 59 RENTAL ASSISTANCE REVOLVING FUND 0 0 60 AFFORDABLE HOMEOWNERSHIP REVOLVING FUND 0 0 61 FOREIGN-TRADE ZONES SPECIAL FUND 0 0 62 TECHNOLOGY SPECIAL FUND 0 0 63 BROWNFIELDS CLEANUP REVOLVING LOAN FUND 0 0 64 HOUSING FINANCE REVOLVING FUND 0 0 Department of Budget and Finance 65 MASS TRANSIT SPECIAL FUND 0 0 Department of Commerce and Consumer Affairs 66 DRIVERS EDUCATION FUND 0 0 67 CAPTIVE INSURANCE ADMINISTRATIVE FUND 0 0 68 MORTGAGE FORECLOSURE DISPUTE RESOLUTION SPECIAL FUND 0 0 69 COMPLIANCE RESOLUTION FUND 0 0 70 PUBLIC UTILITIES COMMISSION SPECIAL FUND 0 0 Department of Education 71 FEDERAL REVENUE MAXIMIZATION PROGRAM REVOLVING FUND 0 0 72 HAWAII TEACHER STANDARDS BOARD SPECIAL FUND 0 0 73 EDUCATION DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION PROJECT ASSESSMENT FUND 0 0 74 SCHOOL FACILITIES SPECIAL FUND 0 0 75 TEACHERS' HOUSING REVOLVING FUND 0 0 76 SCHOOL BUS FARE REVOLVING FUND 0 0 77 LIBRARIES SPECIAL FUND 0 0 78 A+ PROGRAM REVOLVING FUND 0 0 79 EARLY LEARNING SPECIAL FUND 0 0 80 FELIX STIPEND PROGRAM SPECIAL FUND 0 0 81 SCHOOL-LEVEL MINOR REPAIRS AND MAINTENANCE SPECIAL FUND 0 0 82 DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION COMMERCIAL ENTERPRISES REVOLVING FUND 0 0 83 OUT-OF-SCHOOL TIME INSTRUCTIONAL PROGRAM FUND 0 0 84 SCHOOL SPECIAL FEE REVOLVING FUND 0 0 Department of Hawaiian Home Lands 85 HAWAIIAN HOME LOAN FUND 0 0 86 HAWAIIAN HOME GENERAL LOAN FUND 0 0 Department of Human Services 87 RENTAL HOUSING REVOLVING FUND 0 0 88 SPOUSE AND CHILD ABUSE SPECIAL FUND 0 0 89 INTERIM ASSISTANCE REIMBURSEMENT SPECIAL FUND 0 0 90 PRESCHOOL OPEN DOORS SPECIAL FUND 0 0 91 NURSING FACILITY SUSTAINABILITY PROGRAM SPECIAL FUND 0 0 92 HOSPITAL SUSTAINABILITY PROGRAM SPECIAL FUND 0 0 93 HOUSING FOR ELDERS REVOLVING FUND 0 0 94 RANDOLPH-SHEPPARD REVOLVING ACCOUNT 0 0 95 STATE LOW-INCOME HOUSING REVOLVING FUND 0 0 Department of Human Resources Development 96 HUMAN RESOURCES DEVELOPMENT SPECIAL FUND 0 0 Department of Health 97 MENTAL HEALTH AND SUBSTANCE ABUSE SPECIAL FUND 0 0 98 NEUROTRAUMA SPECIAL FUND 0 0 99 ACCESSIBLE PARKING SPECIAL ACCOUNT 0 0 100 NEWBORN METABOLIC SCREENING SPECIAL FUND 0 0 101 HAWAII TOBACCO SETTLEMENT SPECIAL FUND 0 0 102 DRINKING WATER TREATMENT REVOLVING LOAN FUND 0 0 103 WATER POLLUTION CONTROL REVOLVING FUND 0 0 104 ENVIRONMENTAL RESPONSE REVOLVING FUND 0 0 105 CLEAN AIR SPECIAL FUND 0 0 106 DEPOSIT BEVERAGE CONTAINER DEPOSIT SPECIAL FUND 0 0 107 ELECTRONIC DEVICE RECYCLING FUND 0 0 108 NOISE, RADIATION, AND INDOOR AIR QUALITY SPECIAL FUND 0 0 109 ASBESTOS AND LEAD ABATEMENT SPECIAL FUND 0 0 110 LEAKING UNDERGROUND STORAGE TANK FUND 0 0 111 WASTEWATER TREATMENT CERTIFICATION BOARD SPECIAL FUND 0 0 112 SANITATION AND ENVIRONMENTAL HEALTH SPECIAL FUND 0 0 113 ENVIRONMENTAL MANAGEMENT SPECIAL FUND 0 0 114 DRUG DEMAND REDUCTION ASSESSMENTS SPECIAL FUND 0 0 115 INTELLECTUAL AND DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES MEDICAID WAIVER ADMINISTRATIVE CLAIMING SPECIAL FUND 0 0 116 DISABILITY AND COMMUNICATION ACCESS BOARD SPECIAL FUND 0 0 117 ACCESSIBLE PARKING SPECIAL ACCOUNT 0 0 118 BIRTH DEFECTS SPECIAL FUND 0 0 119 COMMUNITY HEALTH CENTERS SPECIAL FUND 0 0 120 DOMESTIC VIOLENCE AND SEXUAL ASSAULT SPECIAL FUND 0 0 121 EARLY INTERVENTION SPECIAL FUND 0 0 122 HAWAII ORGAN AND TISSUE EDUCATION SPECIAL FUND 0 0 123 HAWAII HEMP PROCESSING SPECIAL FUND 0 0 124 MEDICAL CANNABIS REGISTRY AND REGULATION SPECIAL FUND 0 0 125 OFFICE OF HEALTH CARE ASSURANCE SPECIAL FUND 0 0 126 EMERGENCY MEDICAL SERVICES SPECIAL FUND 0 0 127 TRAUMA SYSTEM SPECIAL FUND 0 0 128 VITAL STATISTICS IMPROVEMENT SPECIAL FUND 0 0 129 STATE HEALTH PLANNING AND DEVELOPMENT SPECIAL FUND 0 0 Department of Law Enforcement 130 CONTROLLED SUBSTANCE REGISTRATION REVOLVING FUND 0 0 Department of Labor and Industrial Relations 131 BOILER AND ELEVATOR SAFETY REVOLVING FUND 0 0 132 BOILER AND ELEVATOR REVOLVING FUND 0 0 133 EMPLOYMENT AND TRAINING FUND 0 0 Office of the Lieutenant Governor 134 APOSTILLES AND CERTIFICATIONS SPECIAL FUND 0 0 Department of Land and Natural Resources 135 SPECIAL LAND AND DEVELOPMENT FUND 0 0 136 LAND CONSERVATION FUND 0 0 137 BEACH RESTORATION SPECIAL FUND 0 0 138 LEGACY LAND CONSERVATION PROGRAM FUND 0 0 139 BUREAU OF CONVEYANCES SPECIAL FUND 0 0 140 CONSERVATION AND RESOURCES ENFORCEMENT 0 0 141 PARKS ADMINISTRATION AND OPERATION 0 0 142 FOREST STEWARDSHIP FUND 0 0 143 NA ALA HELE 0 0 144 OCEAN STEWARDSHIP SPECIAL FUND 0 0 145 SPORT FISH SPECIAL FUND 0 0 146 WATER RESOURCE MANAGEMENT FUND 0 0 147 BOATING SPECIAL FUND 0 0 148 WILDLIFE REVOLVING FUND 0 0 149 STATE PARKS SPECIAL FUND 0 0 150 DAM AND RESERVOIR SAFETY SPECIAL FUND 0 0 Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation 151 CORRECTIONAL INDUSTRIES REVOLVING FUND 0 0 152 CRIME VICTIM COMPENSATION SPECIAL FUND 0 0 153 FEDERAL REIMBURSEMENT MAXIMIZATION SPECIAL FUND 0 0 154 AUTOMATED VICTIM INFORMATION AND NOTIFICATION SYSTEM SPECIAL FUND 0 0 Department of Taxation 155 TAX ADMINISTRATION SPECIAL FUND 0 0 156 CIGARETTE TAX STAMP ADMINISTRATIVE SPECIAL FUND 0 0 Department of Transportation 157 STATE HIGHWAY FUND 0 0 158 MOTORCYCLE SAFETY EDUCATION SPECIAL FUND 0 0 159 ALOHA TOWER FUND 0 0 160 RENTAL MOTOR VEHICLE CUSTOMER FACILITY CHARGE SPECIAL FUND 0 0 161 AIRPORT REVENUE FUND 0 0 162 PASSENGER FACILITY CHARGE SPECIAL FUND 0 0 163 HARBOR SPECIAL FUND 0 0 164 SAFE ROUTES TO SCHOOL PROGRAM SPECIAL FUND 0 0 165 MOTORCYCLE AND MOTOR SCOOTER OPERATORS EDUCATION FUND 0 0 166 CIVIL IDENTIFICATION CARD FEE SPECIAL FUND 0 0 167 PHOTO RED LIGHT IMAGING DETECTOR SYSTEMS PROGRAM SPECIAL FUND 0 0 168 DRUG AND ALCOHOL TOXICOLOGY TESTING LABORATORY SPECIAL FUND 0 0 169 AUTOMATED SPEED ENFORCEMENT SYSTEMS PROGRAM SPECIAL FUND 0 0 University of Hawaii 170 UNIVERSITY OF HAWAII RISK MANAGEMENT SPECIAL FUND 0 0 171 UNIVERSITY OF HAWAII AT MANOA MALPRACTICE SPECIAL FUND 0 0 172 UNIVERSITY OF HAWAII TUITION AND FEES SPECIAL FUND 0 0 173 SYSTEMWIDE INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY AND SERVICES SPECIAL FUND 0 0 174 LIBRARY SPECIAL FUND 0 0 175 UNIVERSITY OF HAWAII SCHOLARSHIP AND ASSISTANCE SPECIAL FUND 0 0 176 STATE HIGHER EDUCATION LOAN FUND 0 0 177 CENTER FOR NURSING SPECIAL FUND 0 0 178 STATE AQUARIUM SPECIAL FUND 0 0 179 UNIVERSITY OF HAWAII-WEST OAHU SPECIAL FUND 0 0 180 UNIVERSITY REVENUE-UNDERTAKINGS FUND 0 0 181 HAWAII CANCER RESEARCH SPECIAL FUND 0 0 182 ENERGY SYSTEMS DEVELOPMENT SPECIAL FUND 0 0 183 MAUNA KEA LANDS MANAGEMENT SPECIAL FUND 0 0 184 JOHN A. BURNS SCHOOL OF MEDICINE SPECIAL FUND 0 0 185 UNIVERSITY OF HAWAII CAPITAL IMPROVEMENTS PROGRAM PROJECT ASSESSMENT SPECIAL FUND 0 0 186 CHILD CARE PROGRAMS SPECIAL FUND 0 0 187 UNIVERSITY OF HAWAII AT MANOA INTERCOLLEGIATE ATHLETICS SPECIAL FUND 0 0 188 UNIVERSITY OF HAWAII AT HILO INTERCOLLEGIATE ATHLETICS SPECIAL FUND 0 0 189 UNIVERSITY OF HAWAII-HILO THEATRE SPECIAL FUND 0 0 190 `ULU`ULU:  THE HENRY KU`UALOHA GIUGNI MOVING IMAGE ARCHIVE OF HAWAI`I SPECIAL FUND 0 0 191 UNIVERSITY OF HAWAII GREEN SPECIAL FUND 0 0 192 UNIVERSITY OF HAWAII COMMERCIAL ENTERPRISES REVOLVING FUND 0 0 193 RESEARCH AND TRAINING REVOLVING FUND 0 0 194 STUDENT HEALTH CENTER REVOLVING FUND 0 0 195 TRANSCRIPT AND DIPLOMA REVOLVING FUND 0 0 196 UNIVERSITY OF HAWAII STUDENT ACTIVITIES REVOLVING FUND 0 0 197 UNIVERSITY OF HAWAII GRADUATE APPLICATION REVOLVING FUND 0 0 198 SEED DISTRIBUTION PROGRAM REVOLVING FUND 0 0 199 CENTER FOR LABOR EDUCATION AND RESEARCH REVOLVING FUND 0 0 200 HAWAIIAN LANGUAGE COLLEGE REVOLVING FUND 0 0 201 UNIVERSITY OF HAWAII REAL PROPERTY AND FACILITIES USE REVOLVING FUND 0 0 202 UNIVERSITY PARKING REVOLVING FUND 0 0 203 HAWAII EDUCATOR LOAN PROGRAM REVOLVING FUND 0 0 204 COMMUNITY COLLEGES REVOLVING FUND 0 0 205 UNIVERSITY OF HAWAII CONFERENCE CENTER REVOLVING FUND 0 0 Judiciary 206 JUDICIARY COMPUTER SYSTEM SPECIAL FUND 0 0 207 DRIVER EDUCATION AND TRAINING FUND 0 0 208 INDIGENT LEGAL ASSISTANCE FUND 0 0 209 PARENT EDUCATION SPECIAL FUND 0 0 210 SPOUSE AND CHILD ABUSE SPECIAL ACCOUNT 0 0 211 SUPREME COURT LAW LIBRARY REVOLVING FUND 0 0 212 COURT INTERPRETING SERVICES REVOLVING FUND 0 0 SECTION 3.  It is the intent of this Act not to jeopardize the receipt of any federal aid nor to impair the obligation of the State or any of its agencies to the holders of any bond issued by the State or by any of its agencies, and to the extent, and only to the extent, necessary to effectuate this intent, the governor may modify the strict provisions of this Act, but shall promptly report any modification with reasons therefor to the legislature at its next session thereafter for review by the legislature. SECTION 4.  This Act, upon its approval, shall take effect retroactively on June 30, 2026. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________